Hawaii statutes.
[Part VII.] transportation network companies

Note

Part effective September 1, 2016, and repealed September 1,
2021. L 2016, c 236, §6.

Annual study and report to 2017-2021 legislature by insurance
commissioner on impact of L 2016, c 236 on personal motor vehicle insurance
policy rates in the State (repealed September 1, 2021). L 2016, c 236, §§3, 6.

[§431:10C-701] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Personal vehicle" means a vehicle
that is:

(1) Used by a transportation network company driver
to provide a prearranged ride;

(2) Owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by
the transportation network company driver; and

(3) Not a taxicab, limousine, or other for-hire
vehicle.

"Prearranged ride" means the
provision of transportation by a transportation network company driver to a
passenger, beginning when a transportation network company driver accepts a
passenger's request for a ride through a digital network or software
application service controlled by a transportation network company, continuing
while the transportation network company driver transports the requesting
passenger, and ending when the requesting passenger, or the last passenger from
the requesting passenger's party, departs from the personal vehicle. A
prearranged ride shall not include transportation provided through a
ridesharing arrangement, as defined in section 279G-1; use of a taxicab,
limousine, or other for-hire vehicle; or a regional transportation provider.

"Transportation network company"
means an entity that uses a digital network or software application service to
connect passengers to transportation network company drivers; provided that the
entity:

(1) Does not own, control, operate, or manage the
personal vehicles used by transportation network company drivers; and

(2) Is not a taxicab association or a for-hire
vehicle owner.

"Transportation network company
driver" means an individual who operates a personal vehicle used to
transport a passenger between points chosen by the passenger and prearranged
through a transportation network company and that is:

(1) Owned, leased, or otherwise authorized for use by
the individual;

(2) Not a taxicab or for-hire vehicle; and

(3) Used to provide prearranged rides to passengers.

[L 2016, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next